Illinois, session 104th, HB1755.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5changing Sections 3.07, 3.08, 3.11, 4.01, 4.02, and 4.15 as 6follows: 7    (20 ILCS 105/3.07)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6103.07)8    Sec. 3.07. "Area agency on aging" means any public or 9non-profit private agency in a planning and service area 10designated by the Department, which is eligible for funds 11available under the Older Americans Act and other funds made 12available by the State of Illinois or the federal government.13    Responsibilities of "area agencies" shall include the 14development of an area plan that provides for the development 15of a comprehensive and coordinated service delivery system for 16social and nutrition services needed by older persons and to 17define the special needs of minority senior citizens in the 18planning and service area in which the area agency enters into 19cooperative arrangements with other service planners and 20providers to: 21        (1) Facilitate access to and utilization of all 22    existing services; 23        (2) Develop social and nutrition services effectively   HB1755- 2 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    and efficiently to meet the needs of older persons; and 2        (3) Coordinate existing services to meet the special 3    needs and circumstances of minority senior citizens.4(Source: P.A. 88-254.) 5    (20 ILCS 105/3.08)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6103.08)6    Sec. 3.08. "Planning and Service Area" means a geographic 7area of the State that is designated by the Department for the 8purposes of planning, development, delivery, and overall 9administration of services under the area plan. Within each 10planning and service area the Department must designate an 11area agency on aging. For the purposes of this Section such 12planning and service areas shall be as follows:13    Area 1, which is comprised of the counties of Jo Daviess, 14Stephenson, Winnebago, Boone, Carroll, Ogle, DeKalb, Whiteside 15and Lee;16    Area 2, which is comprised of the counties of McHenry, 17Lake, Kane, DuPage, Kendall, Will, Grundy and Kankakee;18    Area 3, which is comprised of the counties of Rock Island, 19Mercer, Henry, Bureau, LaSalle, Putnam, Henderson, Warren, 20Knox and McDonough;21    Area 4, which is comprised of the counties of Stark, 22Marshall, Peoria, Woodford, Fulton and Tazewell;23    Area 5, which is comprised of the counties of Livingston, 24Iroquois, McLean, Ford, DeWitt, Piatt, Champaign, Vermilion, 25Macon, Moultrie, Douglas, Edgar, Shelby, Coles, Clark and   HB1755- 3 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Cumberland;2    Area 6, which is comprised of the counties of Hancock, 3Schuyler, Adams, Brown, Pike and Calhoun;4    Area 7, which is comprised of the counties of Mason, 5Logan, Cass, Menard, Scott, Morgan, Sangamon, Christian, 6Greene, Macoupin, Montgomery and Jersey;7    Area 8, which is comprised of the counties of Madison, 8Bond, St. Clair, Clinton, Monroe, Washington and Randolph;9    Area 9, which is comprised of the counties of Fayette, 10Effingham, Marion, Clay and Jefferson;11    Area 10, which is comprised of the counties of Jasper, 12Crawford, Richland, Lawrence, Wayne, Edwards, Wabash, Hamilton 13and White;14    Area 11, which is comprised of the counties of Perry, 15Franklin, Jackson, Williamson, Saline, Gallatin, Union, 16Johnson, Pope, Hardin, Alexander, Pulaski and Massac;17    Area 12, which is comprised of the City of Chicago in Cook 18County; and19    Area 13, which is comprised of the County of Cook outside 20the City of Chicago.21    At the discretion of the Department and the county, a 22county of 500,000 population or more may form its own area 23agency.24(Source: P.A. 82-979.) 25    (20 ILCS 105/3.11)  HB1755- 4 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    Sec. 3.11."Greatest social need" means the need caused by 2noneconomic factors that restrict an individual's ability to 3perform normal daily tasks or that threaten the individual's 4his or her capacity to live independently. These factors 5include, but are not limited to, physical or mental 6disability, language barriers, and cultural or social 7isolation caused by, among other things, racial and ethnic 8status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender 9expression, or HIV status.10(Source: P.A. 103-670, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    (20 ILCS 105/4.01)12    Sec. 4.01. Additional powers and duties of the Department. 13In addition to powers and duties otherwise provided by law, 14the Department shall have the following powers and duties:15    (1) To evaluate all programs, services, and facilities for 16the aged and for minority senior citizens within the State and 17determine the extent to which present public or private 18programs, services, and facilities meet the needs of the aged.19    (2) To coordinate and evaluate all programs, services, and 20facilities for the aging Aging and for minority senior 21citizens presently furnished by State agencies and make 22appropriate recommendations regarding such services, programs, 23and facilities to the Governor and/or the General Assembly.24    (2-a) To request, receive, and share information 25electronically through the use of data-sharing agreements for   HB1755- 5 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1the purpose of (i) establishing and verifying the initial and 2continuing eligibility of older adults to participate in 3programs administered by the Department; (ii) maximizing 4federal financial participation in State assistance 5expenditures; and (iii) investigating allegations of fraud or 6other abuse of publicly funded benefits. Notwithstanding any 7other law to the contrary, but only for the limited purposes 8identified in the preceding sentence, this paragraph (2-a) 9expressly authorizes the exchanges of income, identification, 10and other pertinent eligibility information by and among the 11Department and the Social Security Administration, the 12Department of Employment Security, the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of Human 14Services, the Department of Revenue, the Secretary of State, 15the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, and any other 16governmental entity. The confidentiality of information 17otherwise shall be maintained as required by law. In addition, 18the Department on Aging shall verify employment information at 19the request of a community care provider for the purpose of 20ensuring program integrity under the Community Care Program. 21    (3) To function as the sole State agency to develop a 22comprehensive plan to meet the needs of the State's senior 23citizens and the State's minority senior citizens.24    (4) To receive and disburse State and federal funds made 25available directly to the Department including those funds 26made available under the Older Americans Act and the Senior   HB1755- 6 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Community Service Employment Program for providing services 2for senior citizens and minority senior citizens or for 3purposes related thereto, and shall develop and administer any 4State Plan for the Aging required by federal law.5    (5) To solicit, accept, hold, and administer in behalf of 6the State any grants or legacies of money, securities, or 7property to the State of Illinois for services to senior 8citizens and minority senior citizens or purposes related 9thereto.10    (6) To provide consultation and assistance to communities, 11area agencies on aging, and groups developing local services 12for senior citizens and minority senior citizens.13    (7) To promote community education regarding the problems 14of senior citizens and minority senior citizens through 15institutes, publications, radio, television, and the local 16press.17    (8) To cooperate with agencies of the federal government 18in studies and conferences designed to examine the needs of 19senior citizens and minority senior citizens and to prepare 20programs and facilities to meet those needs.21    (9) To establish and maintain information and referral 22sources throughout the State when not provided by other 23agencies.24    (10) To provide the staff support that may reasonably be 25required by the Council.26    (11) To make and enforce rules and regulations necessary   HB1755- 7 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1and proper to the performance of its duties.2    (12) To establish and fund programs or projects or 3experimental facilities that are specially designed as 4alternatives to institutional care.5    (13) To develop a training program to train the counselors 6presently employed by the Department's aging network to 7provide Medicare beneficiaries with counseling and advocacy in 8Medicare, private health insurance, and related health care 9coverage plans.10    (14) (Blank). To make a grant to an institution of higher 11learning to study the feasibility of establishing and 12implementing an affirmative action employment plan for the 13recruitment, hiring, training and retraining of persons 60 or 14more years old for jobs for which their employment would not be 15precluded by law.16    (15) To present one award annually in each of the 17categories of community service, education, the performance 18and graphic arts, and the labor force to outstanding Illinois 19senior citizens and minority senior citizens in recognition of 20their individual contributions to either community service, 21education, the performance and graphic arts, or the labor 22force. Nominations shall be solicited from senior citizens' 23service providers, area agencies on aging, senior citizens' 24centers, and senior citizens' organizations. If there are no 25nominations in a category, the Department may award a second 26person in one of the remaining categories. The Department   HB1755- 8 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1shall establish a central location within the State to be 2designated as the Senior Illinoisans Hall of Fame for the 3public display of all the annual awards, or replicas thereof.4    (16) To establish multipurpose senior centers through area 5agencies on aging and to fund those new and existing 6multipurpose senior centers through area agencies on aging, 7the establishment and funding to begin in such areas of the 8State as the Department shall designate by rule and as 9specifically appropriated funds become available.10    (17) (Blank).11    (18) (Blank). To develop a pamphlet in English and Spanish 12which may be used by physicians licensed to practice medicine 13in all of its branches pursuant to the Medical Practice Act of 141987, pharmacists licensed pursuant to the Pharmacy Practice 15Act, and Illinois residents 65 years of age or older for the 16purpose of assisting physicians, pharmacists, and patients in 17monitoring prescriptions provided by various physicians and to 18aid persons 65 years of age or older in complying with 19directions for proper use of pharmaceutical prescriptions. The 20pamphlet may provide space for recording information including 21but not limited to the following:22        (a) name and telephone number of the patient;23        (b) name and telephone number of the prescribing 24    physician;25        (c) date of prescription;26        (d) name of drug prescribed;  HB1755- 9 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1        (e) directions for patient compliance; and2        (f) name and telephone number of dispensing pharmacy.3    In developing the pamphlet, the Department shall consult 4with the Illinois State Medical Society, the Center for 5Minority Health Services, the Illinois Pharmacists Association 6and senior citizens organizations. The Department shall 7distribute the pamphlets to physicians, pharmacists and 8persons 65 years of age or older or various senior citizen 9organizations throughout the State.10    (19) (Blank). To conduct a study of the feasibility of 11implementing the Senior Companion Program throughout the 12State.13    (20) (Blank). The reimbursement rates paid through the 14community care program for chore housekeeping services and 15home care aides shall be the same.16    (21) (Blank).17    (22) To distribute, through its area agencies on aging, 18information alerting seniors on safety issues regarding 19emergency weather conditions, including extreme heat and cold, 20flooding, tornadoes, electrical storms, and other severe storm 21weather. The information shall include all necessary 22instructions for safety and all emergency telephone numbers of 23organizations that will provide additional information and 24assistance.25    (23) To develop guidelines for the organization and 26implementation of Volunteer Services Credit Programs to be   HB1755- 10 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1administered by Area Agencies on Aging or community-based 2community based senior service organizations. The Department 3shall hold public hearings on the proposed guidelines for 4public comment, suggestion, and determination of public 5interest. The guidelines shall be based on the findings of 6other states and of community organizations in Illinois that 7are currently operating volunteer services credit programs or 8demonstration volunteer services credit programs. The 9Department shall offer guidelines for all aspects of the 10programs, including, but not limited to, the following:11        (a) types of services to be offered by volunteers;12        (b) types of services to be received upon the 13    redemption of service credits;14        (c) issues of liability for the volunteers and the 15    administering organizations;16        (d) methods of tracking service credits earned and 17    service credits redeemed;18        (e) issues of time limits for redemption of service 19    credits;20        (f) methods of recruitment of volunteers;21        (g) utilization of community volunteers, community 22    service groups, and other resources for delivering 23    services to be received by service credit program clients;24        (h) accountability and assurance that services will be 25    available to individuals who have earned service credits; 26    and  HB1755- 11 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1        (i) volunteer screening and qualifications.2    (24) To function as the sole State agency to receive and 3disburse State and federal funds for providing adult 4protective services in a domestic living situation in 5accordance with the Adult Protective Services Act.6    (25) To hold conferences, trainings, and other programs 7for which the Department shall determine by rule a reasonable 8fee to cover related administrative costs. Rules to implement 9the fee authority granted by this paragraph (25) must be 10adopted in accordance with all provisions of the Illinois 11Administrative Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of 12the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported 13rule not so adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized.14    (26) To implement the Older Americans Act. 15(Source: P.A. 103-616, eff. 7-1-24; 103-670, eff. 1-1-25; 16revised 11-26-24.) 17    (20 ILCS 105/4.02)18    Sec. 4.02. Community Care Program. The Department shall 19establish a program of services to prevent unnecessary 20institutionalization of persons age 60 and older in need of 21long term care or who are established as persons who suffer 22from Alzheimer's disease or a related disorder under the 23Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act, thereby enabling them to 24remain in their own homes or in other living arrangements. 25Such preventive services, which may be coordinated with other   HB1755- 12 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1programs for the aged, may include, but are not limited to, any 2or all of the following:3        (a) (blank);4        (b) (blank);5        (c) home care aide services;6        (d) personal assistant services;7        (e) adult day services;8        (f) home-delivered meals;9        (g) education in self-care;10        (h) personal care services;11        (i) adult day health services;12        (j) habilitation services;13        (k) respite care;14        (k-5) community reintegration services; 15        (k-6) flexible senior services;16        (k-7) medication management;17        (k-8) emergency home response; 18        (l) other nonmedical social services that may enable 19    the person to become self-supporting; or20        (m) (blank).21    The Department shall establish eligibility standards for 22such services. In determining the amount and nature of 23services for which a person may qualify, consideration shall 24not be given to the value of cash, property, or other assets 25held in the name of the person's spouse pursuant to a written 26agreement dividing marital property into equal but separate   HB1755- 13 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1shares or pursuant to a transfer of the person's interest in a 2home to his spouse, provided that the spouse's share of the 3marital property is not made available to the person seeking 4such services.5    The Department shall require as a condition of eligibility 6that all new financially eligible applicants apply for and 7enroll in medical assistance under Article V of the Illinois 8Public Aid Code in accordance with rules promulgated by the 9Department. 10    The Department shall, in conjunction with the Department 11of Public Aid (now Department of Healthcare and Family 12Services), seek appropriate amendments under Sections 1915 and 131924 of the Social Security Act. The purpose of the amendments 14shall be to extend eligibility for home and community based 15services under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the Social Security 16Act to persons who transfer to or for the benefit of a spouse 17those amounts of income and resources allowed under Section 181924 of the Social Security Act. Subject to the approval of 19such amendments, the Department shall extend the provisions of 20Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid Code to persons who, but 21for the provision of home or community-based services, would 22require the level of care provided in an institution, as is 23provided for in federal law. Those persons no longer found to 24be eligible for receiving noninstitutional services due to 25changes in the eligibility criteria shall be given 45 days 26notice prior to actual termination. Those persons receiving   HB1755- 14 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1notice of termination may contact the Department and request 2the determination be appealed at any time during the 45 day 3notice period. The target population identified for the 4purposes of this Section are persons age 60 and older with an 5identified service need. Priority shall be given to those who 6are at imminent risk of institutionalization. The services 7shall be provided to eligible persons age 60 and older to the 8extent that the cost of the services together with the other 9personal maintenance expenses of the persons are reasonably 10related to the standards established for care in a group 11facility appropriate to the person's condition. These 12noninstitutional non-institutional services, pilot projects, 13or experimental facilities may be provided as part of or in 14addition to those authorized by federal law or those funded 15and administered by the Department of Human Services. The 16Departments of Human Services, Healthcare and Family Services, 17Public Health, Veterans' Affairs, and Commerce and Economic 18Opportunity and other appropriate agencies of State, federal, 19and local governments shall cooperate with the Department on 20Aging in the establishment and development of the 21noninstitutional non-institutional services. The Department 22shall require an annual audit from all personal assistant and 23home care aide vendors contracting with the Department under 24this Section. The annual audit shall assure that each audited 25vendor's procedures are in compliance with Department's 26financial reporting guidelines requiring an administrative and   HB1755- 15 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1employee wage and benefits cost split as defined in 2administrative rules. The audit is a public record under the 3Freedom of Information Act. The Department shall execute, 4relative to the nursing home prescreening project, written 5inter-agency agreements with the Department of Human Services 6and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, to 7effect the following: (1) intake procedures and common 8eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 9noninstitutional non-institutional services; and (2) the 10establishment and development of noninstitutional 11non-institutional services in areas of the State where they 12are not currently available or are undeveloped. All On and 13after July 1, 1996, all nursing home prescreenings for 14individuals 60 years of age or older shall be conducted by the 15Department.16    As part of the Department on Aging's routine training of 17case managers and case manager supervisors, the Department may 18include information on family futures planning for persons who 19are age 60 or older and who are caregivers of their adult 20children with developmental disabilities. The content of the 21training shall be at the Department's discretion.22    The Department is authorized to establish a system of 23recipient copayment for services provided under this Section, 24such copayment to be based upon the recipient's ability to pay 25but in no case to exceed the actual cost of the services 26provided. Additionally, any portion of a person's income which   HB1755- 16 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1is equal to or less than the federal poverty standard shall not 2be considered by the Department in determining the copayment. 3The level of such copayment shall be adjusted whenever 4necessary to reflect any change in the officially designated 5federal poverty standard.6    The Department, or the Department's authorized 7representative, may recover the amount of moneys expended for 8services provided to or in behalf of a person under this 9Section by a claim against the person's estate or against the 10estate of the person's surviving spouse, but no recovery may 11be had until after the death of the surviving spouse, if any, 12and then only at such time when there is no surviving child who 13is under age 21 or blind or who has a permanent and total 14disability. This paragraph, however, shall not bar recovery, 15at the death of the person, of moneys for services provided to 16the person or in behalf of the person under this Section to 17which the person was not entitled; provided that such recovery 18shall not be enforced against any real estate while it is 19occupied as a homestead by the surviving spouse or other 20dependent, if no claims by other creditors have been filed 21against the estate, or, if such claims have been filed, they 22remain dormant for failure of prosecution or failure of the 23claimant to compel administration of the estate for the 24purpose of payment. This paragraph shall not bar recovery from 25the estate of a spouse, under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the 26Social Security Act and Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid   HB1755- 17 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Code, who precedes a person receiving services under this 2Section in death. All moneys for services paid to or in behalf 3of the person under this Section shall be claimed for recovery 4from the deceased spouse's estate. "Homestead", as used in 5this paragraph, means the dwelling house and contiguous real 6estate occupied by a surviving spouse or relative, as defined 7by the rules and regulations of the Department of Healthcare 8and Family Services, regardless of the value of the property.9    The Department shall increase the effectiveness of the 10existing Community Care Program by:11        (1) ensuring that in-home services included in the 12    care plan are available on evenings and weekends;13        (2) ensuring that care plans contain the services that 14    eligible participants need based on the number of days in 15    a month, not limited to specific blocks of time, as 16    identified by the comprehensive assessment tool selected 17    by the Department for use statewide, not to exceed the 18    total monthly service cost maximum allowed for each 19    service; the Department shall develop administrative rules 20    to implement this item (2);21        (3) ensuring that the participants have the right to 22    choose the services contained in their care plan and to 23    direct how those services are provided, based on 24    administrative rules established by the Department;25        (4)(blank);26        (5) ensuring that homecare aides homemakers can   HB1755- 18 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    provide personal care services that may or may not involve 2    contact with clients, including, but not limited to:3            (A) bathing;4            (B) grooming;5            (C) toileting;6            (D) nail care;7            (E) transferring;8            (F) respiratory services;9            (G) exercise; or10            (H) positioning;11        (6) ensuring that providers homemaker program vendors 12    are not restricted from hiring homecare aides homemakers 13    who are family members of clients or recommended by 14    clients; the Department may not, by rule or policy, 15    require homecare aides homemakers who are family members 16    of clients or recommended by clients to accept assignments 17    in homes other than the client;18        (7) ensuring that the State may access maximum federal 19    matching funds by seeking approval for the Centers for 20    Medicare and Medicaid Services for modifications to the 21    State's home and community based services waiver and 22    additional waiver opportunities, including applying for 23    enrollment in the Balance Incentive Payment Program by May 24    1, 2013, in order to maximize federal matching funds; this 25    shall include, but not be limited to, modification that 26    reflects all changes in the Community Care Program   HB1755- 19 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    services and all increases in the services cost maximum;2        (8) ensuring that the determination of need tool 3    accurately reflects the service needs of individuals with 4    Alzheimer's disease and related dementia disorders; 5        (9) ensuring that services are authorized accurately 6    and consistently for the Community Care Program (CCP); the 7    Department shall implement a Service Authorization policy 8    directive; the purpose shall be to ensure that eligibility 9    and services are authorized accurately and consistently in 10    the CCP program; the policy directive shall clarify 11    service authorization guidelines to Care Coordination 12    Units and Community Care Program providers no later than 13    May 1, 2013;14        (10) working in conjunction with Care Coordination 15    Units, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 16    the Department of Human Services, Community Care Program 17    providers, and other stakeholders to make improvements to 18    the Medicaid claiming processes and the Medicaid 19    enrollment procedures or requirements as needed, 20    including, but not limited to, specific policy changes or 21    rules to improve the up-front enrollment of participants 22    in the Medicaid program and specific policy changes or 23    rules to insure more prompt submission of bills to the 24    federal government to secure maximum federal matching 25    dollars as promptly as possible; the Department on Aging 26    shall have at least 3 meetings with stakeholders by   HB1755- 20 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    January 1, 2014 in order to address these improvements;2        (11) requiring home care service providers to comply 3    with the rounding of hours worked provisions under the 4    federal Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) and as set forth 5    in 29 CFR 785.48(b) by May 1, 2013;6        (12) implementing any necessary policy changes or 7    promulgating any rules, no later than January 1, 2014, to 8    assist the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 9    moving as many participants as possible, consistent with 10    federal regulations, into coordinated care plans if a care 11    coordination plan that covers long term care is available 12    in the recipient's area; and 13        (13) (blank).14    By January 1, 2009 or as soon after the end of the Cash and 15Counseling Demonstration Project as is practicable, the 16Department may, based on its evaluation of the demonstration 17project, promulgate rules concerning personal assistant 18services, to include, but need not be limited to, 19qualifications, employment screening, rights under fair labor 20standards, training, fiduciary agent, and supervision 21requirements. All applicants shall be subject to the 22provisions of the Health Care Worker Background Check Act. 23    The Department shall develop procedures to enhance 24availability of services on evenings, weekends, and on an 25emergency basis to meet the respite needs of caregivers. 26Procedures shall be developed to permit the utilization of   HB1755- 21 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1services in successive blocks of 24 hours up to the monthly 2maximum established by the Department. Workers providing these 3services shall be appropriately trained.4    No September 23, 1991 (Public Act 87-729) person may 5perform homecare aid chore/housekeeping and home care aide 6services under a program authorized by this Section unless 7that person has been issued a certificate of pre-service to do 8so by his or her employing agency. Information gathered to 9effect such certification shall include (i) the person's name, 10(ii) the date the person was hired by his or her current 11employer, and (iii) the training, including dates and levels. 12Persons engaged in the program authorized by this Section 13before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1991 shall 14be issued a certificate of all pre-service and in-service 15training from his or her employer upon submitting the 16necessary information. The employing agency shall be required 17to retain records of all staff pre-service and in-service 18training, and shall provide such records to the Department 19upon request and upon termination of the employer's contract 20with the Department. In addition, the employing agency is 21responsible for the issuance of certifications of in-service 22training completed to their employees.23    The Department is required to develop a system to ensure 24that persons working as home care aides and personal 25assistants receive increases in their wages when the federal 26minimum wage is increased by requiring vendors to certify that   HB1755- 22 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1they are meeting the federal minimum wage statute for home 2care aides and personal assistants. An employer that cannot 3ensure that the minimum wage increase is being given to home 4care aides and personal assistants shall be denied any 5increase in reimbursement costs.6    The Community Care Program Advisory Committee is created 7in the Department on Aging. The Director shall appoint 8individuals to serve in the Committee, who shall serve at 9their own expense. Members of the Committee must abide by all 10applicable ethics laws. The Committee shall advise the 11Department on issues related to the Department's program of 12services to prevent unnecessary institutionalization. The 13Committee shall meet on a bi-monthly basis and shall serve to 14identify and advise the Department on present and potential 15issues affecting the service delivery network, the program's 16clients, and the Department and to recommend solution 17strategies. Persons appointed to the Committee shall be 18appointed on, but not limited to, their own and their agency's 19experience with the program, geographic representation, and 20willingness to serve. The Director shall appoint members to 21the Committee to represent provider, advocacy, policy 22research, and other constituencies committed to the delivery 23of high quality home and community-based services to older 24adults. Representatives shall be appointed to ensure 25representation from community care providers, including, but 26not limited to, adult day service providers, in-home service   HB1755- 23 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1providers homemaker providers, case coordination and case 2management units, emergency home response providers, statewide 3trade or labor unions that represent home care aides and 4direct care staff, area agencies on aging, adults over age 60, 5membership organizations representing older adults, and other 6organizational entities, providers of care, or individuals 7with demonstrated interest and expertise in the field of home 8and community care as determined by the Director.9    Nominations may be presented from any agency or State 10association with interest in the program. The Director, or his 11or her designee, shall serve as the permanent co-chair of the 12advisory committee. One other co-chair shall be nominated and 13approved by the members of the committee on an annual basis. 14Committee members' terms of appointment shall be for 4 years 15with one-quarter of the appointees' terms expiring each year. 16A member shall continue to serve until his or her replacement 17is named. The Department shall fill vacancies that have a 18remaining term of over one year, and this replacement shall 19occur through the annual replacement of expiring terms. The 20Director shall designate Department staff to provide technical 21assistance and staff support to the committee. Department 22representation shall not constitute membership of the 23committee. All Committee papers, issues, recommendations, 24reports, and meeting memoranda are advisory only. The 25Director, or his or her designee, shall make a written report, 26as requested by the Committee, regarding issues before the   HB1755- 24 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Committee. 2    The Department on Aging and the Department of Human 3Services shall cooperate in the development and submission of 4an annual report on programs and services provided under this 5Section. Such joint report shall be filed with the Governor 6and the General Assembly on or before March 31 of the following 7fiscal year.8    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 9shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 10by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act and 11filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 12Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 13under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.14    Those persons previously found eligible for receiving 15noninstitutional non-institutional services whose services 16were discontinued under the Emergency Budget Act of Fiscal 17Year 1992, and who do not meet the eligibility standards in 18effect on or after July 1, 1992, shall remain ineligible on and 19after July 1, 1992. Those persons previously not required to 20cost-share and who were required to cost-share effective March 211, 1992, shall continue to meet cost-share requirements on and 22after July 1, 1992. Beginning July 1, 1992, all clients will be 23required to meet eligibility, cost-share, and other 24requirements and will have services discontinued or altered 25when they fail to meet these requirements.26    For the purposes of this Section, "flexible senior   HB1755- 25 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1services" refers to services that require one-time or periodic 2expenditures, including, but not limited to, respite care, 3home modification, assistive technology, housing assistance, 4and transportation. 5    The Department shall implement an electronic service 6verification based on global positioning systems or other 7cost-effective technology for the Community Care Program no 8later than January 1, 2014. 9    The Department shall require, as a condition of 10eligibility, application for the medical assistance program 11under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 12    The Department may authorize Community Care Program 13services until an applicant is determined eligible for medical 14assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 15    The Department shall continue to provide Community Care 16Program reports as required by statute, which shall include an 17annual report on Care Coordination Unit performance and 18adherence to service guidelines and a 6-month supplemental 19report. 20    In regard to community care providers, failure to comply 21with Department on Aging policies shall be cause for 22disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, 23disqualification from serving Community Care Program clients. 24Each provider, upon submission of any bill or invoice to the 25Department for payment for services rendered, shall include a 26notarized statement, under penalty of perjury pursuant to   HB1755- 26 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that the 2provider has complied with all Department policies. 3    The Director of the Department on Aging shall make 4information available to the State Board of Elections as may 5be required by an agreement the State Board of Elections has 6entered into with a multi-state voter registration list 7maintenance system. 8    The Department shall pay an enhanced rate of at least 9$1.77 per unit under the Community Care Program to those 10in-home service provider agencies that offer health insurance 11coverage as a benefit to their direct service worker employees 12pursuant to rules adopted by the Department. The Department 13shall review the enhanced rate as part of its process to rebase 14in-home service provider reimbursement rates pursuant to 15federal waiver requirements. Subject to federal approval, 16beginning on January 1, 2024, rates for adult day services 17shall be increased to $16.84 per hour and rates for each way 18transportation services for adult day services shall be 19increased to $12.44 per unit transportation. 20    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2024, 21rates for homecare aid homemaker services shall be increased 22to $28.07 to sustain a minimum wage of $17 per hour for direct 23service workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall 24be no lower than the rates put into effect upon federal 25approval. Providers of in-home services shall be required to 26certify to the Department that they remain in compliance with   HB1755- 27 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1the mandated wage increase for direct service workers. Fringe 2benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 3payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 4transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 5increases described in this paragraph. 6    Subject to and upon federal approval, on and after January 71, 2025, rates for homecare aid homemaker services shall be 8increased to $29.63 to sustain a minimum wage of $18 per hour 9for direct service workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal 10years shall be no lower than the rates put into effect upon 11federal approval. Providers of in-home services shall be 12required to certify to the Department that they remain in 13compliance with the mandated wage increase for direct service 14workers. Fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, paid 15time off and payment for training, health insurance, travel, 16or transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the 17rate increases described in this paragraph. 18    The General Assembly finds it necessary to authorize an 19aggressive Medicaid enrollment initiative designed to maximize 20federal Medicaid funding for the Community Care Program which 21produces significant savings for the State of Illinois. The 22Department on Aging shall establish and implement a Community 23Care Program Medicaid Initiative. Under the Initiative, the 24Department on Aging shall, at a minimum: (i) provide an 25enhanced rate to adequately compensate care coordination units 26to enroll eligible Community Care Program clients into   HB1755- 28 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Medicaid; (ii) use recommendations from a stakeholder 2committee on how best to implement the Initiative; and (iii) 3establish requirements for State agencies to make enrollment 4in the State's Medical Assistance program easier for seniors. 5    The Community Care Program Medicaid Enrollment Oversight 6Subcommittee is created as a subcommittee of the Older Adult 7Services Advisory Committee established in Section 35 of the 8Older Adult Services Act to make recommendations on how best 9to increase the number of medical assistance recipients who 10are enrolled in the Community Care Program. The Subcommittee 11shall consist of all of the following persons who must be 12appointed within 30 days after June 4, 2018 (the effective 13date of Public Act 100-587): 14        (1) The Director of Aging, or his or her designee, who 15    shall serve as the chairperson of the Subcommittee. 16        (2) One representative of the Department of Healthcare 17    and Family Services, appointed by the Director of 18    Healthcare and Family Services. 19        (3) One representative of the Department of Human 20    Services, appointed by the Secretary of Human Services. 21        (4) One individual representing a care coordination 22    unit, appointed by the Director of Aging. 23        (5) One individual from a non-governmental statewide 24    organization that advocates for seniors, appointed by the 25    Director of Aging. 26        (6) One individual representing Area Agencies on   HB1755- 29 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    Aging, appointed by the Director of Aging. 2        (7) One individual from a statewide association 3    dedicated to Alzheimer's care, support, and research, 4    appointed by the Director of Aging. 5        (8) One individual from an organization that employs 6    persons who provide services under the Community Care 7    Program, appointed by the Director of Aging. 8        (9) One member of a trade or labor union representing 9    persons who provide services under the Community Care 10    Program, appointed by the Director of Aging. 11        (10) One member of the Senate, who shall serve as 12    co-chairperson, appointed by the President of the Senate. 13        (11) One member of the Senate, who shall serve as 14    co-chairperson, appointed by the Minority Leader of the 15    Senate. 16        (12) One member of the House of Representatives, who 17    shall serve as co-chairperson, appointed by the Speaker of 18    the House of Representatives. 19        (13) One member of the House of Representatives, who 20    shall serve as co-chairperson, appointed by the Minority 21    Leader of the House of Representatives. 22        (14) One individual appointed by a labor organization 23    representing frontline employees at the Department of 24    Human Services. 25    The Subcommittee shall provide oversight to the Community 26Care Program Medicaid Initiative and shall meet quarterly. At   HB1755- 30 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1each Subcommittee meeting the Department on Aging shall 2provide the following data sets to the Subcommittee: (A) the 3number of Illinois residents, categorized by planning and 4service area, who are receiving services under the Community 5Care Program and are enrolled in the State's Medical 6Assistance Program; (B) the number of Illinois residents, 7categorized by planning and service area, who are receiving 8services under the Community Care Program, but are not 9enrolled in the State's Medical Assistance Program; and (C) 10the number of Illinois residents, categorized by planning and 11service area, who are receiving services under the Community 12Care Program and are eligible for benefits under the State's 13Medical Assistance Program, but are not enrolled in the 14State's Medical Assistance Program. In addition to this data, 15the Department on Aging shall provide the Subcommittee with 16plans on how the Department on Aging will reduce the number of 17Illinois residents who are not enrolled in the State's Medical 18Assistance Program but who are eligible for medical assistance 19benefits. The Department on Aging shall enroll in the State's 20Medical Assistance Program those Illinois residents who 21receive services under the Community Care Program and are 22eligible for medical assistance benefits but are not enrolled 23in the State's Medicaid Assistance Program. The data provided 24to the Subcommittee shall be made available to the public via 25the Department on Aging's website. 26    The Department on Aging, with the involvement of the   HB1755- 31 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Subcommittee, shall collaborate with the Department of Human 2Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 3on how best to achieve the responsibilities of the Community 4Care Program Medicaid Initiative. 5    The Department on Aging, the Department of Human Services, 6and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 7coordinate and implement a streamlined process for seniors to 8access benefits under the State's Medical Assistance Program. 9    The Subcommittee shall collaborate with the Department of 10Human Services on the adoption of a uniform application 11submission process. The Department of Human Services and any 12other State agency involved with processing the medical 13assistance application of any person enrolled in the Community 14Care Program shall include the appropriate care coordination 15unit in all communications related to the determination or 16status of the application. 17    The Community Care Program Medicaid Initiative shall 18provide targeted funding to care coordination units to help 19seniors complete their applications for medical assistance 20benefits. On and after July 1, 2019, care coordination units 21shall receive no less than $200 per completed application, 22which rate may be included in a bundled rate for initial intake 23services when Medicaid application assistance is provided in 24conjunction with the initial intake process for new program 25participants.26    The Community Care Program Medicaid Initiative shall cease   HB1755- 32 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1operation 5 years after June 4, 2018 (the effective date of 2Public Act 100-587), after which the Subcommittee shall 3dissolve. 4    Effective July 1, 2023, subject to federal approval, the 5Department on Aging shall reimburse Care Coordination Units at 6the following rates for case management services: $252.40 for 7each initial assessment; $366.40 for each initial assessment 8with translation; $229.68 for each redetermination assessment; 9$313.68 for each redetermination assessment with translation; 10$200.00 for each completed application for medical assistance 11benefits; $132.26 for each face-to-face, choices-for-care 12screening; $168.26 for each face-to-face, choices-for-care 13screening with translation; $124.56 for each 6-month, 14face-to-face visit; $132.00 for each MCO participant 15eligibility determination; and $157.00 for each MCO 16participant eligibility determination with translation. 17(Source: P.A. 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 18103-102, Article 45, Section 45-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, 19Article 85, Section 85-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 90, 20Section 90-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24; 103-670, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 22    (20 ILCS 105/4.15)23    Sec. 4.15. Benefit Access Program Eligibility 24determinations.25    (a) The Department shall implement and administer the   HB1755- 33 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Benefit Access Program. Under this program, the Department 2shall establish the eligibility criteria for The Department is 3authorized to make eligibility determinations for benefits 4administered by other governmental bodies based on the Senior 5Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act 6as follows: 7        (i) for the Secretary of State with respect to reduced 8    fees paid by qualified vehicle owners under the Illinois 9    Vehicle Code; 10        (ii) for special districts that offer free fixed route 11    public transportation services for qualified older adults 12    under the Local Mass Transit District Act, the 13    Metropolitan Transit Authority Act, and the Regional 14    Transportation Authority Act; and 15        (iii) for special districts that offer transit 16    services for qualified individuals with disabilities under 17    the Local Mass Transit District Act, the Metropolitan 18    Transit Authority Act, and the Regional Transportation 19    Authority Act. 20    (a-5) As used in this Section, unless the context requires 21otherwise:22    "Disability" means the inability to engage in any 23substantial gainful activity by reason of a medically 24determinable physical or mental impairment which can be 25expected to result in death or has lasted or can be expected to 26last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months.  HB1755- 34 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    "Income" means adjusted gross income, properly reportable 2for federal income tax purposes under the provisions of the 3Internal Revenue Code, modified by adding thereto the sum of 4the following amounts to the extent deducted or excluded from 5gross income in the computation of adjusted gross income:6        (1) an amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued as 7    interest or dividends during the taxable year;8        (2) an amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by the 9    Illinois Income Tax Act paid for the taxable year;10        (3) an amount equal to all amounts received during the 11    taxable year as an annuity under an annuity, endowment, or 12    life insurance contract or under any other contract or 13    agreement;14        (4) an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid 15    under the federal Social Security Act during the taxable 16    year;17        (5) an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid 18    under the Railroad Retirement Act during the taxable year;19        (6) an amount equal to the total amount of cash public 20    assistance payments received from any governmental agency 21    during the taxable year other than benefits received under 22    this Act; or23        (7) an amount equal to any benefits received under the 24    Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 25    Diseases Act during the taxable year.26    For individuals who are not required to file federal   HB1755- 35 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1income tax returns, the Department shall adopt rules to 2specify the process to verify income.3    "Income" does not include any distributions or items of 4income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 5subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.6    (a-10) To be eligible for benefits under the Benefit 7Access Program, an individual shall:8        (1) meet the income requirements;9        (2) be at least 65 years of age or older or be 16 years 10    of age or older before January 1 of the current year and 11    have a disability; and12        (3) be a resident of Illinois.13    (a-15) The household income eligibility limits are:14        (1) for an individual, less than $33,562;15        (2) for a 2-person household, less than $44,533; or16        (3) for a household of 3 or more people, $55,500. 17    The Department may adopt rules such that on January 1, 182027, and thereafter, the foregoing household income 19eligibility limits may be changed to reflect the annual cost 20of living adjustment in Social Security and Supplemental 21Security Income benefits that are applicable to the year for 22which those benefits are being reported as income on an 23application. 24    (b) The Department shall establish the manner by which 25individuals claimants shall apply for these benefits. The 26Department is authorized to promulgate rules regarding the   HB1755- 36 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1following matters: the application cycle; the application 2process; the content for an electronic application; required 3personal identification information; acceptable proof of 4eligibility as to age, disability status, marital status, 5residency, and household income limits; household composition; 6calculating income; use of social security numbers; duration 7of eligibility determinations; automatic renewals; appeal 8rights; and any other matters necessary for such 9administrative operations. 10    (c) All information received by the Department from an 11application or from any investigation to determine eligibility 12for benefits shall be confidential, except for official 13purposes. 14    (d) A person may not under any circumstances charge a fee 15to a claimant for assistance in completing an application form 16for these benefits. 17(Source: P.A. 98-887, eff. 8-15-14; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 18    Section 10. The Mobile Home Local Services Tax Act is 19amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 20    (35 ILCS 515/7)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1207)21    Sec. 7. The local services tax for owners of mobile homes 22who (a) are actually residing in such mobile homes, (b) hold 23title to such mobile home as provided in the Illinois Vehicle 24Code, and (c) are 65 years of age or older or are persons with   HB1755- 37 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1disabilities within the meaning of subsection (a-15) of 2Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the Aging Section 3.14 of 3the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax 4Relief Act on the annual billing date shall be reduced to 80 5percent of the tax provided for in Section 3 of this Act. Proof 6that a claimant has been issued an Illinois Person with a 7Disability Identification Card stating that the claimant is 8under a Class 2 disability, as provided in Section 4A of the 9Illinois Identification Card Act, shall constitute proof that 10the person thereon named is a person with a disability within 11the meaning of this Act. An application for reduction of the 12tax shall be filed with the county clerk by the individuals who 13are entitled to the reduction. If the application is filed 14after May 1, the reduction in tax shall begin with the next 15annual bill. Application for the reduction in tax shall be 16done by submitting proof that the applicant has been issued an 17Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 18designating the applicant's disability as a Class 2 19disability, or by affidavit in substantially the following 20form:21APPLICATION FOR REDUCTION OF MOBILE HOME LOCAL SERVICES TAX22    I hereby make application for a reduction to 80% of the 23total tax imposed under "An Act to provide for a local services 24tax on mobile homes".25    (1) Senior Citizens26    (a) I actually reside in the mobile home ....  HB1755- 38 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (b) I hold title to the mobile home as provided in the 2Illinois Vehicle Code ....3    (c) I reached the age of 65 on or before either January 1 4(or July 1) of the year in which this statement is filed. My 5date of birth is: ...6    (2) Persons with Disabilities7    (a) I actually reside in the mobile home...8    (b) I hold title to the mobile home as provided in the 9Illinois Vehicle Code ....10    (c) I became a person with a total disability on ... and 11have remained a person with a disability until the date of this 12application. My Social Security, Veterans, Railroad or Civil 13Service Total Disability Claim Number is ... The undersigned 14declares under the penalty of perjury that the above 15statements are true and correct.16Dated (insert date).17...........................18Signature of owner19...........................20(Address)21...........................22(City) (State) (Zip)23Approved by: 24............................. 25(Assessor)    HB1755- 39 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1This application shall be accompanied by a copy of the 2applicant's most recent application filed with the Illinois 3Department on Aging under Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on 4the Aging the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities 5Property Tax Relief Act.6(Source: P.A. 98-463, eff. 8-16-13; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 7    Section 15. The Metropolitan Transit Authority Act is 8amended by changing Sections 51 and 52 as follows: 9    (70 ILCS 3605/51)10    Sec. 51. Free and reduced fare services; eligibility.11    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 1260 days following January 18, 2008 (the effective date of 13Public Act 95-708) and until subsection (b) is implemented, 14any fixed route public transportation services provided by, or 15under grant or purchase of service contracts of, the Board 16shall be provided without charge to all senior citizens of the 17Metropolitan Region (as such term is defined in Section 1.03 18of the Regional Transportation Authority Act) aged 65 and 19older, under such conditions as shall be prescribed by the 20Board.21    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 22180 days following February 14, 2011 (the effective date of 23Public Act 96-1527), any fixed route public transportation 24services provided by, or under grant or purchase of service   HB1755- 40 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1contracts of, the Board shall be provided without charge to 2senior citizens aged 65 and older who meet the income 3eligibility limitation set forth in subsection (a-15) of 4Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the Aging subsection (a-5) 5of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and Persons with 6Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such conditions as 7shall be prescribed by the Board. The Department on Aging 8shall furnish all information reasonably necessary to 9determine eligibility, including updated lists of individuals 10who are eligible for services without charge under this 11Section. After an initial eligibility determination is made, 12an individual's eligibility for free services shall 13automatically renew every 5 years after receipt by the 14Authority of a copy of the individual's government-issued 15identification card validating Illinois residency. Nothing in 16this Section shall relieve the Board from providing reduced 17fares as may be required by federal law. 18    (c) The Board shall partner with the City of Chicago to 19provide transportation at reduced fares for participants in 20programs that offer employment and internship opportunities to 21youth and young adults ages 14 through 24. 22(Source: P.A. 103-241, eff. 1-1-24; 103-281, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    (70 ILCS 3605/52)25    Sec. 52. Transit services for individuals with   HB1755- 41 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1disabilities. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no 2later than 60 days following the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, all fixed route 4public transportation services provided by, or under grant or 5purchase of service contract of, the Board shall be provided 6without charge to all persons with disabilities who meet the 7income eligibility limitation set forth in subsection (a-15) 8of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the Aging subsection 9(a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and Persons with 10Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such procedures as 11shall be prescribed by the Board. The Department on Aging 12shall furnish all information reasonably necessary to 13determine eligibility, including updated lists of individuals 14who are eligible for services without charge under this 15Section. After an initial eligibility determination is made, 16an individual's eligibility for free services shall 17automatically renew every 5 years after receipt by the 18Authority of a copy of the individual's government-issued 19identification card validating Illinois residency. Individuals 20who have not submitted an Illinois Persons with a Disability 21Identification Card to the Authority shall also submit a 22document verifying the individual's disability. 23(Source: P.A. 103-241, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    Section 20. The Local Mass Transit District Act is amended 25by changing Sections 8.6 and 8.7 as follows:   HB1755- 42 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (70 ILCS 3610/8.6)2    Sec. 8.6. Free services; eligibility.3    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 460 days following the effective date of this amendatory Act of 5the 95th General Assembly and until subsection (b) is 6implemented, any fixed route public transportation services 7provided by, or under grant or purchase of service contracts 8of, every District shall be provided without charge to all 9senior citizens of the District aged 65 and older, under such 10conditions as shall be prescribed by the District.11    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 12180 days following the effective date of this amendatory Act 13of the 96th General Assembly, any fixed route public 14transportation services provided by, or under grant or 15purchase of service contracts of, every District shall be 16provided without charge to senior citizens aged 65 and older 17who meet the income eligibility limitation set forth in 18subsection (a-15) of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the 19Aging subsection (a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and 20Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such 21conditions as shall be prescribed by the District. The 22Department on Aging shall furnish all information reasonably 23necessary to determine eligibility, including updated lists of 24individuals who are eligible for services without charge under 25this Section. Nothing in this Section shall relieve the   HB1755- 43 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1District from providing reduced fares as may be required by 2federal law. 3(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 4    (70 ILCS 3610/8.7)5    Sec. 8.7. Transit services for individuals with 6disabilities. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no 7later than 60 days following the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, all fixed route 9public transportation services provided by, or under grant or 10purchase of service contract of, any District shall be 11provided without charge to all persons with disabilities who 12meet the income eligibility limitation set forth in subsection 13(a-15) of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the Aging 14subsection (a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and 15Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such 16procedures as shall be prescribed by the District. The 17Department on Aging shall furnish all information reasonably 18necessary to determine eligibility, including updated lists of 19individuals who are eligible for services without charge under 20this Section.21(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 22    Section 25. The Regional Transportation Authority Act is 23amended by changing Sections 3A.15, 3A.16, 3B.14, and 3B.15 as 24follows:   HB1755- 44 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (70 ILCS 3615/3A.15)2    Sec. 3A.15. Free services; eligibility.3    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 460 days following the effective date of this amendatory Act of 5the 95th General Assembly and until subsection (b) is 6implemented, any fixed route public transportation services 7provided by, or under grant or purchase of service contracts 8of, the Suburban Bus Board shall be provided without charge to 9all senior citizens of the Metropolitan Region aged 65 and 10older, under such conditions as shall be prescribed by the 11Suburban Bus Board.12    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 13180 days following the effective date of this amendatory Act 14of the 96th General Assembly, any fixed route public 15transportation services provided by, or under grant or 16purchase of service contracts of, the Suburban Bus Board shall 17be provided without charge to senior citizens aged 65 and 18older who meet the income eligibility limitation set forth in 19subsection (a-15) of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the 20Aging subsection (a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and 21Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such 22conditions as shall be prescribed by the Suburban Bus Board. 23The Department on Aging shall furnish all information 24reasonably necessary to determine eligibility, including 25updated lists of individuals who are eligible for services   HB1755- 45 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1without charge under this Section. After an initial 2eligibility determination is made, an individual's eligibility 3for free services shall automatically renew every 5 years 4after receipt by the Authority of a copy of the individual's 5government-issued identification card validating Illinois 6residency. Nothing in this Section shall relieve the Suburban 7Bus Board from providing reduced fares as may be required by 8federal law. 9(Source: P.A. 103-241, eff. 1-1-24.) 10    (70 ILCS 3615/3A.16)11    Sec. 3A.16. Transit services for individuals with 12disabilities. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no 13later than 60 days following the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, all fixed route 15public transportation services provided by, or under grant or 16purchase of service contract of, the Suburban Bus Board shall 17be provided without charge to all persons with disabilities 18who meet the income eligibility limitation set forth in 19subsection (a-15) of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the 20Aging subsection (a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and 21Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such 22procedures as shall be prescribed by the Board. The Department 23on Aging shall furnish all information reasonably necessary to 24determine eligibility, including updated lists of individuals 25who are eligible for services without charge under this   HB1755- 46 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Section. After an initial eligibility determination is made, 2an individual's eligibility for free services shall 3automatically renew every 5 years after receipt by the 4Authority of a copy of the individual's government-issued 5identification card validating Illinois residency. Individuals 6who have not submitted an Illinois Persons with a Disability 7Identification Card to the Authority shall also submit a 8document verifying the individual's disability. 9(Source: P.A. 103-241, eff. 1-1-24.) 10    (70 ILCS 3615/3B.14)11    Sec. 3B.14. Free services; eligibility. 12    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 1360 days following the effective date of this amendatory Act of 14the 95th General Assembly and until subsection (b) is 15implemented, any fixed route public transportation services 16provided by, or under grant or purchase of service contracts 17of, the Commuter Rail Board shall be provided without charge 18to all senior citizens of the Metropolitan Region aged 65 and 19older, under such conditions as shall be prescribed by the 20Commuter Rail Board.21    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no later than 22180 days following the effective date of this amendatory Act 23of the 96th General Assembly, any fixed route public 24transportation services provided by, or under grant or 25purchase of service contracts of, the Commuter Rail Board   HB1755- 47 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1shall be provided without charge to senior citizens aged 65 2and older who meet the income eligibility limitation set forth 3in subsection (a-15) of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the 4Aging subsection (a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and 5Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such 6conditions as shall be prescribed by the Commuter Rail Board. 7The Department on Aging shall furnish all information 8reasonably necessary to determine eligibility, including 9updated lists of individuals who are eligible for services 10without charge under this Section. After an initial 11eligibility determination is made, an individual's eligibility 12for free services shall automatically renew every 5 years 13after receipt by the Authority of a copy of the individual's 14government-issued identification card validating Illinois 15residency. Nothing in this Section shall relieve the Commuter 16Rail Board from providing reduced fares as may be required by 17federal law. 18(Source: P.A. 103-241, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (70 ILCS 3615/3B.15)20    Sec. 3B.15. Transit services for individuals with 21disabilities. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no 22later than 60 days following the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, all fixed route 24public transportation services provided by, or under grant or 25purchase of service contract of, the Commuter Rail Board shall   HB1755- 48 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1be provided without charge to all persons with disabilities 2who meet the income eligibility limitation set forth in 3subsection (a-15) of Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the 4Aging subsection (a-5) of Section 4 of the Senior Citizens and 5Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, under such 6procedures as shall be prescribed by the Board. The Department 7on Aging shall furnish all information reasonably necessary to 8determine eligibility, including updated lists of individuals 9who are eligible for services without charge under this 10Section. After an initial eligibility determination is made, 11an individual's eligibility for free services shall 12automatically renew every 5 years after receipt by the 13Authority of a copy of the individual's government-issued 14identification card validating Illinois residency. Individuals 15who have not submitted an Illinois Persons with a Disability 16Identification Card to the Authority shall also submit a 17document verifying the individual's disability. 18(Source: P.A. 103-241, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    Section 30. The Senior Citizen Courses Act is amended by 20changing Section 1 as follows: 21    (110 ILCS 990/1)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1801)22    Sec. 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act:23    (a) "Public institutions of higher education" means the 24University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago   HB1755- 49 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 2University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 3University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 4University, and the public community colleges subject to the 5"Public Community College Act".6    (b) "Credit Course" means any program of study for which 7public institutions of higher education award credit hours.8    (c) "Senior citizen" means any person 65 years or older 9whose annual household income is less than the threshold 10amount provided in subsection (a-15) of Section 4.15 of the 11Illinois Act on the Aging Section 4 of the "Senior Citizens and 12Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act", approved 13July 17, 1972, as amended.14(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 15    Section 35. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 16changing Sections 4-1.6, 4-2, 6-1.2, and 6-2 as follows: 17    (305 ILCS 5/4-1.6)  (from Ch. 23, par. 4-1.6)18    Sec. 4-1.6. Need. Income available to the family as 19defined by the Illinois Department by rule, or to the child in 20the case of a child removed from his or her home, when added to 21contributions in money, substance or services from other 22sources, including income available from parents absent from 23the home or from a stepparent, contributions made for the 24benefit of the parent or other persons necessary to provide   HB1755- 50 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1care and supervision to the child, and contributions from 2legally responsible relatives, must be equal to or less than 3the grant amount established by Department regulation for such 4a person. For purposes of eligibility for aid under this 5Article, the Department shall (a) disregard all earned income 6between the grant amount and 50% of the Federal Poverty Level 7and (b) disregard the value of all assets held by the family. 8    In considering income to be taken into account, 9consideration shall be given to any expenses reasonably 10attributable to the earning of such income. Three-fourths of 11the earned income of a household eligible for aid under this 12Article shall be disregarded when determining the level of 13assistance for which a household is eligible. All child 14support, whether it be current support, past support owed, or 15future support, that is collected on or after January 1, 2023 16on behalf of a family shall be passed through to the family and 17disregarded in determining the amount of the assistance grant 18provided to the family under this Article. Any amount of child 19support that would be disregarded in determining the amount of 20the assistance grant shall be disregarded in determining 21eligibility for cash assistance provided under this Article. 22The Illinois Department may also permit all or any portion of 23earned or other income to be set aside for the future 24identifiable needs of a child. The Illinois Department may 25provide by rule and regulation for the exemptions thus 26permitted or required. The eligibility of any applicant for or   HB1755- 51 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1recipient of public aid under this Article is not affected by 2the payment of any benefits provided grant under the Benefits 3Access Program administered under Section 4.15 of the Illinois 4Act on the Aging "Senior Citizens and Persons with 5Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act" or any distributions or 6items of income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph 7(2) of subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax 8Act.9    The Illinois Department may, by rule, set forth criteria 10under which an assistance unit is ineligible for cash 11assistance under this Article for a specified number of months 12due to the receipt of a lump sum payment.13(Source: P.A. 102-1115, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    (305 ILCS 5/4-2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 4-2)15    Sec. 4-2. Amount of aid. 16    (a) The amount and nature of financial aid shall be 17determined in accordance with the grant amounts, rules and 18regulations of the Illinois Department. Due regard shall be 19given to the self-sufficiency requirements of the family and 20to the income, money contributions and other support and 21resources available, from whatever source. However, the amount 22and nature of any financial aid is not affected by the payment 23of any benefits provided grant under the Benefits Access 24Program administered under Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on 25the Aging "Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities   HB1755- 52 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Property Tax Relief Act" or any distributions or items of 2income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 3subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 4The aid shall be sufficient, when added to all other income, 5money contributions and support to provide the family with a 6grant in the amount established by Department regulation. 7    (a-5) For the purposes of this subsection, TANF grant 8amounts shall consist of the following portions: 9        (1) 75% shall be designated for the child or children 10    of the assistance unit; and 11        (2) 25% shall be designated for the adult member or 12    members of the assistance unit. 13    (b) The Illinois Department may conduct special projects, 14which may be known as Grant Diversion Projects, under which 15recipients of financial aid under this Article are placed in 16jobs and their grants are diverted to the employer who in turn 17makes payments to the recipients in the form of salary or other 18employment benefits. The Illinois Department shall by rule 19specify the terms and conditions of such Grant Diversion 20Projects. Such projects shall take into consideration and be 21coordinated with the programs administered under the Illinois 22Emergency Employment Development Act.23    (c) The amount and nature of the financial aid for a child 24requiring care outside his own home shall be determined in 25accordance with the rules and regulations of the Illinois 26Department, with due regard to the needs and requirements of   HB1755- 53 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1the child in the foster home or institution in which he has 2been placed.3    (d) If the Department establishes grants for family units 4consisting exclusively of a pregnant woman with no dependent 5child or including her husband if living with her, the grant 6amount for such a unit shall be equal to the grant amount for 7an assistance unit consisting of one adult, or 2 persons if the 8husband is included. Other than as herein described, an unborn 9child shall not be counted in determining the size of an 10assistance unit or for calculating grants.11    Payments for basic maintenance requirements of a child or 12children and the relative with whom the child or children are 13living shall be prescribed, by rule, by the Illinois 14Department.15    Grants under this Article shall not be supplemented by 16General Assistance provided under Article VI.17    (e) Grants shall be paid to the parent or other person with 18whom the child or children are living, except for such amount 19as is paid in behalf of the child or his parent or other 20relative to other persons or agencies pursuant to this Code or 21the rules and regulations of the Illinois Department.22    (f) Subject to subsection (f-5), an assistance unit, 23receiving financial aid under this Article or temporarily 24ineligible to receive aid under this Article under a penalty 25imposed by the Illinois Department for failure to comply with 26the eligibility requirements or that voluntarily requests   HB1755- 54 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1termination of financial assistance under this Article and 2becomes subsequently eligible for assistance within 9 months, 3shall not receive any increase in the amount of aid solely on 4account of the birth of a child; except that an increase is not 5prohibited when the birth is (i) of a child of a pregnant woman 6who became eligible for aid under this Article during the 7pregnancy, or (ii) of a child born within 10 months after the 8date of implementation of this subsection, or (iii) of a child 9conceived after a family became ineligible for assistance due 10to income or marriage and at least 3 months of ineligibility 11expired before any reapplication for assistance. This 12subsection does not, however, prevent a unit from receiving a 13general increase in the amount of aid that is provided to all 14recipients of aid under this Article.15    The Illinois Department is authorized to transfer funds, 16and shall use any budgetary savings attributable to not 17increasing the grants due to the births of additional 18children, to supplement existing funding for employment and 19training services for recipients of aid under this Article IV. 20The Illinois Department shall target, to the extent the 21supplemental funding allows, employment and training services 22to the families who do not receive a grant increase after the 23birth of a child. In addition, the Illinois Department shall 24provide, to the extent the supplemental funding allows, such 25families with up to 24 months of transitional child care 26pursuant to Illinois Department rules. All remaining   HB1755- 55 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1supplemental funds shall be used for employment and training 2services or transitional child care support.3    In making the transfers authorized by this subsection, the 4Illinois Department shall first determine, pursuant to 5regulations adopted by the Illinois Department for this 6purpose, the amount of savings attributable to not increasing 7the grants due to the births of additional children. Transfers 8may be made from General Revenue Fund appropriations for 9distributive purposes authorized by Article IV of this Code 10only to General Revenue Fund appropriations for employability 11development services including operating and administrative 12costs and related distributive purposes under Article IXA of 13this Code. The Director, with the approval of the Governor, 14shall certify the amount and affected line item appropriations 15to the State Comptroller.16    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit 17the Illinois Department from using funds under this Article IV 18to provide assistance in the form of vouchers that may be used 19to pay for goods and services deemed by the Illinois 20Department, by rule, as suitable for the care of the child such 21as diapers, clothing, school supplies, and cribs.22    (f-5) Subsection (f) shall not apply to affect the monthly 23assistance amount of any family as a result of the birth of a 24child on or after January 1, 2004. As resources permit after 25January 1, 2004, the Department may cease applying subsection 26(f) to limit assistance to families receiving assistance under   HB1755- 56 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1this Article on January 1, 2004, with respect to children born 2prior to that date. In any event, subsection (f) shall be 3completely inoperative on and after July 1, 2007.4    (g) (Blank).5    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 6Illinois Department is authorized to reduce payment levels 7used to determine cash grants under this Article after 8December 31 of any fiscal year if the Illinois Department 9determines that the caseload upon which the appropriations for 10the current fiscal year are based have increased by more than 115% and the appropriation is not sufficient to ensure that cash 12benefits under this Article do not exceed the amounts 13appropriated for those cash benefits. Reductions in payment 14levels may be accomplished by emergency rule under Section 155-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, except that 16the limitation on the number of emergency rules that may be 17adopted in a 24-month period shall not apply and the 18provisions of Sections 5-115 and 5-125 of the Illinois 19Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply. Increases in 20payment levels shall be accomplished only in accordance with 21Section 5-40 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 22Before any rule to increase payment levels promulgated under 23this Section shall become effective, a joint resolution 24approving the rule must be adopted by a roll call vote by a 25majority of the members elected to each chamber of the General 26Assembly.  HB1755- 57 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1(Source: P.A. 101-103, eff. 7-19-19.) 2    (305 ILCS 5/6-1.2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6-1.2)3    Sec. 6-1.2. Need. Income available to the person, when 4added to contributions in money, substance, or services from 5other sources, including contributions from legally 6responsible relatives, must be insufficient to equal the grant 7amount established by Department regulation (or by local 8governmental unit in units which do not receive State funds) 9for such a person.10    In determining income to be taken into account:11        (1) The first $75 of earned income in income 12    assistance units comprised exclusively of one adult person 13    shall be disregarded, and for not more than 3 months in any 14    12 consecutive months that portion of earned income beyond 15    the first $75 that is the difference between the standard 16    of assistance and the grant amount, shall be disregarded.17        (2) For income assistance units not comprised 18    exclusively of one adult person, when authorized by rules 19    and regulations of the Illinois Department, a portion of 20    earned income, not to exceed the first $25 a month plus 50% 21    of the next $75, may be disregarded for the purpose of 22    stimulating and aiding rehabilitative effort and 23    self-support activity.24    "Earned income" means money earned in self-employment or 25wages, salary, or commission for personal services performed   HB1755- 58 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1as an employee. The eligibility of any applicant for or 2recipient of public aid under this Article is not affected by 3the payment of any benefits provided grant under the Benefits 4Access Program administered under Section 4.15 of the Illinois 5Act on the Aging "Senior Citizens and Persons with 6Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act", any refund or payment 7of the federal Earned Income Tax Credit, any rebate authorized 8under Section 2201(a) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and 9Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136) or under any other 10federal economic stimulus program created in response to the 11COVID-19 emergency, or any distributions or items of income 12described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 13subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.14(Source: P.A. 101-632, eff. 6-5-20.) 15    (305 ILCS 5/6-2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6-2)16    Sec. 6-2. Amount of aid. The amount and nature of General 17Assistance for basic maintenance requirements shall be 18determined in accordance with local budget standards for local 19governmental units which do not receive State funds. For local 20governmental units which do receive State funds, the amount 21and nature of General Assistance for basic maintenance 22requirements shall be determined in accordance with the 23standards, rules and regulations of the Illinois Department. 24However, the amount and nature of any financial aid is not 25affected by the payment of any benefits provided grant under   HB1755- 59 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1the Benefits Access Program administered under Section 4.15 of 2the Illinois Act on the Aging Senior Citizens and Persons with 3Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, any rebate authorized 4under Section 2201(a) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and 5Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136) or under any other 6federal economic stimulus program created in response to the 7COVID-19 emergency, or any distributions or items of income 8described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 9subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 10Due regard shall be given to the requirements and the 11conditions existing in each case, and to the income, money 12contributions and other support and resources available, from 13whatever source. In local governmental units which do not 14receive State funds, the grant shall be sufficient when added 15to all other income, money contributions and support in excess 16of any excluded income or resources, to provide the person 17with a grant in the amount established for such a person by the 18local governmental unit based upon standards meeting basic 19maintenance requirements. In local governmental units which do 20receive State funds, the grant shall be sufficient when added 21to all other income, money contributions and support in excess 22of any excluded income or resources, to provide the person 23with a grant in the amount established for such a person by 24Department regulation based upon standards providing a 25livelihood compatible with health and well-being, as directed 26by Section 12-4.11 of this Code.  HB1755- 60 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    The Illinois Department may conduct special projects, 2which may be known as Grant Diversion Projects, under which 3recipients of financial aid under this Article are placed in 4jobs and their grants are diverted to the employer who in turn 5makes payments to the recipients in the form of salary or other 6employment benefits. The Illinois Department shall by rule 7specify the terms and conditions of such Grant Diversion 8Projects. Such projects shall take into consideration and be 9coordinated with the programs administered under the Illinois 10Emergency Employment Development Act.11    The allowances provided under Article IX for recipients 12participating in the training and rehabilitation programs 13shall be in addition to such maximum payment.14    Payments may also be made to provide persons receiving 15basic maintenance support with necessary treatment, care and 16supplies required because of illness or disability or with 17acute medical treatment, care, and supplies. Payments for 18necessary or acute medical care under this paragraph may be 19made to or in behalf of the person. Obligations incurred for 20such services but not paid for at the time of a recipient's 21death may be paid, subject to the rules and regulations of the 22Illinois Department, after the death of the recipient.23(Source: P.A. 101-632, eff. 6-5-20.) 24    Section 40. The Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral 25Act is amended by changing Section 8 as follows:   HB1755- 61 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (320 ILCS 30/8)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 458)2    Sec. 8. Nothing in this Act (a) affects any provision of 3any mortgage or other instrument relating to land requiring a 4person to pay real estate taxes or (b) affects the eligibility 5of any person to receive any grant pursuant to the "Senior 6Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief 7Act".8(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 9    Section 45. The Older Adult Services Act is amended by 10changing Section 35 as follows: 11    (320 ILCS 42/35)12    Sec. 35. Older Adult Services Advisory Committee. 13    (a) The Older Adult Services Advisory Committee is created 14to advise the directors of Aging, Healthcare and Family 15Services, and Public Health on all matters related to this Act 16and the delivery of services to older adults in general. 17    (b) The Advisory Committee shall be comprised of the 18following: 19        (1) The Director of Aging or his or her designee, who 20    shall serve as chair and shall be an ex officio and 21    nonvoting member. 22        (2) The Director of Healthcare and Family Services and 23    the Director of Public Health or their designees, who   HB1755- 62 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    shall serve as vice-chairs and shall be ex officio and 2    nonvoting members. 3        (3) One representative each of the Governor's Office, 4    the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the 5    Department of Public Health, the Department of Veterans' 6    Affairs, the Department of Human Services, the Department 7    of Insurance, the Department on Aging, the Department on 8    Aging's State Long Term Care Ombudsman, the Illinois 9    Housing Finance Authority, and the Illinois Housing 10    Development Authority, each of whom shall be selected by 11    his or her respective director and shall be an ex officio 12    and nonvoting member. 13        (4) Thirty members appointed by the Director of Aging 14    in collaboration with the directors of Public Health and 15    Healthcare and Family Services, and selected from the 16    recommendations of statewide associations and 17    organizations, as follows: 18            (A) One member representing the Area Agencies on 19        Aging; 20            (B) Four members representing nursing homes or 21        licensed assisted living establishments; 22            (C) One member representing home health agencies; 23            (D) One member representing case management 24        services; 25            (E) One member representing statewide senior 26        center associations;   HB1755- 63 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1            (F) One member representing Community Care Program 2        homemaker services; 3            (G) One member representing Community Care Program 4        adult day services; 5            (H) One member representing nutrition project 6        directors; 7            (I) One member representing hospice programs; 8            (J) One member representing individuals with 9        Alzheimer's disease and related dementias; 10            (K) Two members representing statewide trade or 11        labor unions; 12            (L) One advanced practice registered nurse with 13        experience in gerontological nursing; 14            (M) One physician specializing in gerontology; 15            (N) One member representing regional long-term 16        care ombudsmen; 17            (O) One member representing municipal, township, 18        or county officials; 19            (P) (Blank); 20            (Q) (Blank); 21            (R) One member representing the parish nurse 22        movement; 23            (S) One member representing pharmacists; 24            (T) Two members representing statewide 25        organizations engaging in advocacy or legal 26        representation on behalf of the senior population;   HB1755- 64 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1            (U) Two family caregivers; 2            (V) Two citizen members over the age of 60; 3            (W) One citizen with knowledge in the area of 4        gerontology research or health care law; 5            (X) One representative of health care facilities 6        licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act; and 7            (Y) One representative of primary care service 8        providers.9    The Director of Aging, in collaboration with the Directors 10of Public Health and Healthcare and Family Services, may 11appoint additional citizen members to the Older Adult Services 12Advisory Committee. Each such additional member must be either 13an individual age 60 or older or an uncompensated caregiver 14for a family member or friend who is age 60 or older. 15    (c) Voting members of the Advisory Committee shall serve 16for a term of 3 years or until a replacement is named. All 17members shall be appointed no later than January 1, 2005. Of 18the initial appointees, as determined by lot, 10 members shall 19serve a term of one year; 10 shall serve for a term of 2 years; 20and 12 shall serve for a term of 3 years. Any member appointed 21to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term 22for which his or her predecessor was appointed shall be 23appointed for the remainder of that term. The Advisory 24Committee shall meet at least quarterly and may meet more 25frequently at the call of the Chair. A simple majority of those 26appointed shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative vote of a   HB1755- 65 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1majority of those present and voting shall be necessary for 2Advisory Committee action. Members of the Advisory Committee 3shall receive no compensation for their services. 4    (d) The Advisory Committee shall have an Executive 5Committee comprised of the Chair, the Vice Chairs, and up to 15 6members of the Advisory Committee appointed by the Chair who 7have demonstrated expertise in developing, implementing, or 8coordinating the system restructuring initiatives defined in 9Section 25. The Executive Committee shall have responsibility 10to oversee and structure the operations of the Advisory 11Committee and to create and appoint necessary subcommittees 12and subcommittee members. The Advisory Committee's Community 13Care Program Medicaid Enrollment Oversight Subcommittee shall 14have the membership and powers and duties set forth in Section 154.02 of the Illinois Act on the Aging.16    (e) The Advisory Committee shall study and make 17recommendations related to the implementation of this Act, 18including, but not limited to, system restructuring 19initiatives as defined in Section 25 or otherwise related to 20this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 100-587, eff. 6-4-18; 22100-621, eff. 7-20-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 23    Section 50. The Senior Pharmaceutical Assistance Act is 24amended by changing Section 5 as follows:   HB1755- 66 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (320 ILCS 50/5)2    Sec. 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds:3    (1) Senior citizens identify pharmaceutical assistance as 4the single most critical factor to their health, well-being, 5and continued independence.6    (2) The State of Illinois currently operates one 2 7pharmaceutical assistance programs that benefit seniors: (i) 8the program of pharmaceutical assistance under the Senior 9Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act 10and (ii) the Aid to the Aged, Blind, or Disabled program under 11the Illinois Public Aid Code. The State has been given 12authority to establish a third program, SeniorRx Care, through 13a federal Medicaid waiver.14    (3) Each year, numerous pieces of legislation are filed 15seeking to establish additional pharmaceutical assistance 16benefits for seniors or to make changes to the existing 17programs.18    (4) Establishment of a pharmaceutical assistance review 19committee will ensure proper coordination of benefits, 20diminish the likelihood of duplicative benefits, and ensure 21that the best interests of seniors are served.22    (5) In addition to the State pharmaceutical assistance 23programs, several private entities, such as drug manufacturers 24and pharmacies, also offer prescription drug discount or 25coverage programs.26    (6) Many seniors are unaware of the myriad of public and   HB1755- 67 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1private programs available to them.2    (7) Establishing a pharmaceutical clearinghouse with a 3toll-free hot-line and local outreach workers will educate 4seniors about the vast array of options available to them and 5enable seniors to make an educated and informed choice that is 6best for them.7    (8) Estimates indicate that almost one-third of senior 8citizens lack prescription drug coverage. The federal 9government, states, and the pharmaceutical industry each have 10a role in helping these uninsured seniors gain access to 11life-saving medications.12    (9) The State of Illinois has recognized its obligation to 13assist Illinois' neediest seniors in purchasing prescription 14medications, and it is now time for pharmaceutical 15manufacturers to recognize their obligation to make their 16medications affordable to seniors.17(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 18    Section 55. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 19changing Sections 3-609, 3-626, 3-667, 3-806.3, and 11-1301.2 20as follows: 21    (625 ILCS 5/3-609)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-609)22    Sec. 3-609. Plates for veterans with disabilities. 23    (a) Any veteran who holds proof of a service-connected 24disability from the United States Department of Veterans   HB1755- 68 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Affairs, and who has obtained certification from a licensed 2physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 3registered nurse that the service-connected disability 4qualifies the veteran for issuance of registration plates or 5digital registration plates or decals to a person with 6disabilities in accordance with Section 3-616, may, without 7the payment of any registration fee, make application to the 8Secretary of State for license plates for veterans with 9disabilities displaying the international symbol of access, 10for the registration of one motor vehicle of the first 11division, one motorcycle, or one motor vehicle of the second 12division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds.13    (b) Any veteran who holds proof of a service-connected 14disability from the United States Department of Veterans 15Affairs, and whose degree of disability has been declared to 16be 50% or more, but whose disability does not qualify the 17veteran for a plate or decal for persons with disabilities 18under Section 3-616, may, without the payment of any 19registration fee, make application to the Secretary for a 20special registration plate or digital registration plate 21without the international symbol of access for the 22registration of one motor vehicle of the first division, one 23motorcycle, or one motor vehicle of the second division 24weighing not more than 8,000 pounds.25    (c) Renewal of such registration must be accompanied with 26documentation for eligibility of registration without fee   HB1755- 69 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1unless the applicant has a permanent qualifying disability, 2and such registration plates or digital registration plates 3may not be issued to any person not eligible therefor. The 4Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs may assist in 5providing the documentation of disability.6    (d) The design and color of the plates shall be within the 7discretion of the Secretary, except that the plates issued 8under subsection (b) of this Section shall not contain the 9international symbol of access. The Secretary may, in his or 10her discretion, allow the plates to be issued as vanity or 11personalized plates in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this 12Code. Registration shall be for a multi-year period and may be 13issued staggered registration. 14    (e) Any person eligible to receive license plates under 15this Section who has been approved for benefits under the 16Benefits Access Program administered under Section 4.15 of the 17Illinois Act on the Aging Senior Citizens and Persons with 18Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, or who has claimed and 19received a grant under that Act, shall pay a fee of $24 instead 20of the fee otherwise provided in this Code for passenger cars 21displaying standard multi-year registration plates or digital 22registration plates issued under Section 3-414.1, for motor 23vehicles registered at 8,000 pounds or less under Section 243-815(a), or for recreational vehicles registered at 8,000 25pounds or less under Section 3-815(b), for a second set of 26plates under this Section.   HB1755- 70 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (f) With respect to the supporting documentation required 2to obtain a plate under this Section, the Secretary shall 3allow an applicant to redact information on the documentation 4that pertains to the nature of the applicant's health issue, 5unless that information is necessary to confirm that the 6applicant's disability is service-connected or to establish 7the degree of the applicant's service-connected disability. 8(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19; 101-536, eff. 1-1-20; 9102-273, eff. 8-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (625 ILCS 5/3-626)11    Sec. 3-626. Korean War Veteran license plates. 12    (a) In addition to any other special license plate, the 13Secretary, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 14applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary of 15State, may issue special registration plates designated as 16Korean War Veteran license plates to residents of Illinois who 17participated in the United States Armed Forces during the 18Korean War. The special plate issued under this Section shall 19be affixed only to passenger vehicles of the first division, 20motorcycles, motor vehicles of the second division weighing 21not more than 8,000 pounds, and recreational vehicles as 22defined by Section 1-169 of this Code. Plates issued under 23this Section shall expire according to the staggered 24multi-year procedure established by Section 3-414.1 of this 25Code.  HB1755- 71 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    (b) The design, color, and format of the plates shall be 2wholly within the discretion of the Secretary of State. The 3Secretary may, in his or her discretion, allow the plates to be 4issued as vanity plates or personalized in accordance with 5Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The plates are not required to 6designate "Land Of Lincoln", as prescribed in subsection (b) 7of Section 3-412 of this Code. The Secretary shall prescribe 8the eligibility requirements and, in his or her discretion, 9shall approve and prescribe stickers or decals as provided 10under Section 3-412.11    (c) (Blank).12    (d) (Blank). 13    (e) An individual who has been issued Korean War Veteran 14license plates for a vehicle and who has been approved for 15benefits under the Benefits Access Program administered under 16Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the Aging Senior Citizens 17and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act shall 18pay the original issuance and the regular annual fee for the 19registration of the vehicle as provided in Section 3-806.3 of 20this Code.21(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-616, eff. 7-1-24.) 22    (625 ILCS 5/3-667)23    Sec. 3-667. Korean Service license plates.24    (a) In addition to any other special license plate, the 25Secretary, upon receipt of all applicable fees and   HB1755- 72 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary of 2State, may issue special registration plates designated as 3Korean Service license plates to residents of Illinois who, on 4or after July 27, 1954, participated in the United States 5Armed Forces in Korea. The special plate issued under this 6Section shall be affixed only to passenger vehicles of the 7first division, motorcycles, motor vehicles of the second 8division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds, and recreational 9vehicles as defined by Section 1-169 of this Code. Plates 10issued under this Section shall expire according to the 11staggered multi-year procedure established by Section 3-414.1 12of this Code.13    (b) The design, color, and format of the plates shall be 14wholly within the discretion of the Secretary of State. The 15Secretary may, in his or her discretion, allow the plates to be 16issued as vanity or personalized plates in accordance with 17Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The plates are not required to 18designate "Land of Lincoln", as prescribed in subsection (b) 19of Section 3-412 of this Code. The Secretary shall prescribe 20the eligibility requirements and, in his or her discretion, 21shall approve and prescribe stickers or decals as provided 22under Section 3-412. 23    (c) (Blank). 24    (d) An individual who has been issued Korean Service 25license plates for a vehicle and who has been approved for 26benefits under the Benefits Access Program administered under   HB1755- 73 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the Aging Senior Citizens 2and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act shall 3pay the original issuance and the regular annual fee for the 4registration of the vehicle as provided in Section 3-806.3 of 5this Code in addition to the fees specified in subsection (c) 6of this Section. 7(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 8    (625 ILCS 5/3-806.3)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-806.3)9    Sec. 3-806.3. Senior citizens. Commencing with the 2025 102009 registration year, the registration fee paid by any 11vehicle owner who has been approved for benefits under the 12Benefits Access Program administered under Section 4.15 of the 13Illinois Act on the Aging the Senior Citizens and Persons with 14Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act or who is the spouse of 15such a person shall be $10 instead of the fee otherwise 16provided in this Code for passenger cars displaying standard 17multi-year registration plates or digital registration plates 18issued under Section 3-414.1, motor vehicles displaying 19special registration plates or digital registration plates 20issued under Section 3-607, 3-609, 3-616, 3-621, 3-622, 3-623, 213-624, 3-625, 3-626, 3-628, 3-638, 3-642, 3-645, 3-647, 3-650, 223-651, 3-663, 3-664, or 3-699.17, motor vehicles registered at 238,000 pounds or less under Section 3-815(a), and recreational 24vehicles registered at 8,000 pounds or less under Section 253-815(b). Widows and widowers of claimants shall also be   HB1755- 74 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1entitled to this reduced registration fee for the registration 2year in which the claimant was eligible. 3    Commencing with the 2009 registration year, the 4registration fee paid by any vehicle owner who has claimed and 5received a grant under the Senior Citizens and Persons with 6Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act or who is the spouse of 7such a person shall be $10 instead of the fee otherwise 8provided in this Code for passenger cars displaying standard 9multi-year registration plates or digital registration plates 10issued under Section 3-414.1, motor vehicles displaying 11special registration plates or digital registration plates 12issued under Section 3-607, 3-609, 3-616, 3-621, 3-622, 3-623, 133-624, 3-625, 3-626, 3-628, 3-638, 3-642, 3-645, 3-647, 3-650, 143-651, 3-663, 3-664, or 3-699.17, motor vehicles registered at 158,000 pounds or less under Section 3-815(a), and recreational 16vehicles registered at 8,000 pounds or less under Section 173-815(b). Widows and widowers of claimants shall also be 18entitled to this reduced registration fee for the registration 19year in which the claimant was eligible. 20    Commencing with the 2017 registration year, the reduced 21fee under this Section shall apply to any special registration 22plate or digital registration plate authorized in Article VI 23of Chapter 3 of this Code for which the applicant would 24otherwise be eligible. 25    Surcharges for vehicle registrations under Section 3-806 26of this Code shall not be collected from any vehicle owner who   HB1755- 75 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1has been approved for benefits under the Benefits Access 2Program administered under Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on 3the Aging the Senior Citizens and Disabled Persons Property 4Tax Relief Act or a person who is the spouse of such a person. 5    No more than one reduced registration fee under this 6Section shall be allowed during any 12-month period based on 7the primary eligibility of any individual, whether such 8reduced registration fee is allowed to the individual or to 9the spouse, widow or widower of such individual. This Section 10does not apply to the fee paid in addition to the registration 11fee for motor vehicles displaying vanity, personalized, or 12special license plates.13(Source: P.A. 101-51, eff. 7-12-19; 101-395, eff. 8-16-19; 14102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-807, eff. 1-1-23.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-1301.2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1301.2)16    Sec. 11-1301.2. Special decals for parking; persons with 17disabilities. 18    (a) The Secretary of State shall provide for, by 19administrative rules, the design, size, color, and placement 20of a person with disabilities motorist decal or device and 21shall provide for, by administrative rules, the content and 22form of an application for a person with disabilities motorist 23decal or device, which shall be used by local authorities in 24the issuance thereof to a person with temporary disabilities, 25provided that the decal or device is valid for no more than 90   HB1755- 76 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1days, subject to renewal for like periods based upon continued 2disability, and further provided that the decal or device 3clearly sets forth the date that the decal or device expires. 4The application shall include the requirement of an Illinois 5Identification Card number or a State of Illinois driver's 6license number or, if the applicant does not have an 7identification card or driver's license number, then the 8applicant may use a valid identification number issued by a 9branch of the U.S. military or a federally issued Medicare or 10Medicaid identification number. This decal or device may be 11used by the authorized holder to designate and identify a 12vehicle not owned or displaying a registration plate or 13digital registration plate as provided in Sections 3-609 and 143-616 of this Act to designate when the vehicle is being used 15to transport said person or persons with disabilities, and 16thus is entitled to enjoy all the privileges that would be 17afforded a person with disabilities licensed vehicle. Person 18with disabilities decals or devices issued and displayed 19pursuant to this Section shall be recognized and honored by 20all local authorities regardless of which local authority 21issued such decal or device.22    The decal or device shall be issued only upon a showing by 23adequate documentation that the person for whose benefit the 24decal or device is to be used has a disability as defined in 25Section 1-159.1 of this Code and the disability is temporary.26    (a-5) The Secretary may provide a disabilities motorist   HB1755- 77 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1decal or device to an expectant mother during her third 2trimester. An application under this subsection is subject to 3application requirements under subsection (a). The decal or 4device shall be valid for no more than 90 days, and shall 5clearly set forth the date that the decal or device expires. 6The decal or device shall be issued only upon a showing by 7adequate documentation that the expectant mother has entered 8her third trimester. 9    (b) The local governing authorities shall be responsible 10for the provision of such decal or device, its issuance and 11designated placement within the vehicle. The cost of such 12decal or device shall be at the discretion of such local 13governing authority.14    (c) The Secretary of State may, pursuant to Section 153-616(c), issue a person with disabilities parking decal or 16device to a person with disabilities as defined by Section 171-159.1. Any person with disabilities parking decal or device 18issued by the Secretary of State shall be registered to that 19person with disabilities in the form to be prescribed by the 20Secretary of State. The person with disabilities parking decal 21or device shall not display that person's address. One 22additional decal or device may be issued to an applicant upon 23his or her written request and with the approval of the 24Secretary of State. The written request must include a 25justification of the need for the additional decal or device.26    (c-5) Beginning January 1, 2014, the Secretary shall   HB1755- 78 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1provide by administrative rule for the issuance of a separate 2and distinct parking decal or device for persons with 3disabilities as defined by Section 1-159.1 of this Code and 4who meet the qualifications under this subsection. The 5authorized holder of a decal or device issued under this 6subsection (c-5) shall be exempt from the payment of fees 7generated by parking in a metered space, a parking area 8subject to paragraph (10) of subsection (a) of Section 11-209 9of this Code, or a publicly owned parking area.10    The Secretary shall issue a meter-exempt decal or device 11to a person with disabilities who: (i) has been issued 12registration plates or digital registration plates under 13subsection (a) of Section 3-609 or Section 3-616 of this Code 14or a special decal or device under this Section, (ii) holds a 15valid Illinois driver's license, and (iii) is unable to do one 16or more of the following:17        (1) manage, manipulate, or insert coins, or obtain 18    tickets or tokens in parking meters or ticket machines in 19    parking lots, due to the lack of fine motor control of both 20    hands;21        (2) reach above his or her head to a height of 42 22    inches from the ground, due to a lack of finger, hand, or 23    upper extremity strength or mobility;24        (3) approach a parking meter due to his or her use of a 25    wheelchair or other device for mobility; or26        (4) walk more than 20 feet due to an orthopedic,   HB1755- 79 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    neurological, cardiovascular, or lung condition in which 2    the degree of debilitation is so severe that it almost 3    completely impedes the ability to walk.4    The application for a meter-exempt parking decal or device 5shall contain a statement certified by a licensed physician, 6physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 7attesting to the permanent nature of the applicant's condition 8and verifying that the applicant meets the physical 9qualifications specified in this subsection (c-5).10    Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection (c-5), 11the Secretary shall issue a meter-exempt decal or device to a 12person who has been issued registration plates or digital 13registration plates under Section 3-616 of this Code or a 14special decal or device under this Section, if the applicant 15is the parent or guardian of a person with disabilities who is 16under 18 years of age and incapable of driving.17    (d) Replacement decals or devices may be issued for lost, 18stolen, or destroyed decals upon application and payment of a 19$10 fee. The replacement fee may be waived for individuals who 20that have received benefits under the Benefits Access Program 21administered under Section 4.15 of the Illinois Act on the 22Aging claimed and received a grant under the Senior Citizens 23and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act.24    (e) A person classified as a veteran under subsection (e) 25of Section 6-106 of this Code that has been issued a decal or 26device under this Section shall not be required to submit   HB1755- 80 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1evidence of disability in order to renew that decal or device 2if, at the time of initial application, he or she submitted 3evidence from his or her physician or the Department of 4Veterans' Affairs that the disability is of a permanent 5nature. However, the Secretary shall take reasonable steps to 6ensure the veteran still resides in this State at the time of 7the renewal. These steps may include requiring the veteran to 8provide additional documentation or to appear at a Secretary 9of State facility. To identify veterans who are eligible for 10this exemption, the Secretary shall compare the list of the 11persons who have been issued a decal or device to the list of 12persons who have been issued a vehicle registration plate or 13digital registration plate for veterans with disabilities 14under Section 3-609 of this Code, or who are identified as a 15veteran on their driver's license under Section 6-110 of this 16Code or on their identification card under Section 4 of the 17Illinois Identification Card Act. 18(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19; 102-453, eff. 1-1-22.) 19    (320 ILCS 25/Act rep.)20    Section 60. The Senior Citizens and Persons with 21Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act is repealed.  HB1755- 81 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 105/3.07from Ch. 23, par. 6103.074    20 ILCS 105/3.08from Ch. 23, par. 6103.085    20 ILCS 105/3.116    20 ILCS 105/4.017    20 ILCS 105/4.028    20 ILCS 105/4.159    35 ILCS 515/7from Ch. 120, par. 120710    70 ILCS 3605/5111    70 ILCS 3605/5212    70 ILCS 3610/8.613    70 ILCS 3610/8.714    70 ILCS 3615/3A.1515    70 ILCS 3615/3A.1616    70 ILCS 3615/3B.1417    70 ILCS 3615/3B.1518    110 ILCS 990/1from Ch. 144, par. 180119    305 ILCS 5/4-1.6from Ch. 23, par. 4-1.620    305 ILCS 5/4-2from Ch. 23, par. 4-221    305 ILCS 5/6-1.2from Ch. 23, par. 6-1.222    305 ILCS 5/6-2from Ch. 23, par. 6-223    320 ILCS 30/8from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 45824    320 ILCS 42/3525    320 ILCS 50/5  HB1755- 82 -LRB104 05853 KTG 15884 b1    625 ILCS 5/3-609from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-6092    625 ILCS 5/3-6263    625 ILCS 5/3-6674    625 ILCS 5/3-806.3from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-806.35    625 ILCS 5/11-1301.2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1301.26    320 ILCS 25/Act rep.